Illinois, session 104th, HB5652.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 15    Section 1. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to meet 7the ordinary and contingent expenses of the Prisoner Review 8Board for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027:9PAYABLE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND10  For Personal Services.............................3,322,00011  For State Contributions to12   Social Security....................................254,20013  For Contractual Services............................302,00014  For Travel..........................................119,50015  For Commodities.......................................4,50016  For Printing..........................................3,00017  For Equipment.............................................018  For Electronic Data Processing.......................86,50019  For Telecommunication Services.......................64,70020    Total                                          $4,156,400 21    Section 5. The amount of $1,302,400, or so much thereof as 22may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue   HB5652- 2 -OMB104 00264 HAR 10264 b1Fund to the Prisoner Review Board for operating costs and 2expenses including but not limited to court orders, consent 3decrees, and settlements. 4    Section 10. The amount of $185,000, or so much thereof as 5may be necessary, is appropriated from the Prisoner Review 6Board Vehicle and Equipment Fund to the Prisoner Review Board 7for all ordinary and contingent expenses of the Board, but not 8including personal services. 9    Section 15. The amount of $1,000,000, or so much thereof 10as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 11Fund to the Prisoner Review Board for costs associated with 12providing legal counsel and operational expenses. 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 142026.